Utah statutes.
32B-2-405.   Reporting by municipalities and counties -- Grants.

(1)  A municipality or county that receives money under this part during a fiscal year shall by no later than October 1 following the fiscal year:

(a)  report to the advisory council:

(i)  the programs or projects of the municipality or county that receive money under this part;

(ii)  if the money for programs or projects were exclusively used as required by Subsection 32B-2-403(2);

(iii)  indicators of whether the programs or projects that receive money under this part are effective; and

(iv)  if money received under this part was not expended by the municipality or county; and

(b)  provide the advisory council a statement signed by the chief executive officer of the county or municipality attesting that the money received under this part was used in addition to money appropriated or otherwise available for the county's or municipality's law enforcement and was not used to supplant that money.

(2)  The advisory council may, by a majority vote:

(a)  suspend future payments under Subsection 32B-2-404(4) to a municipality or county that:

(i)  does not file a report that meets the requirements of Subsection (1); or

(ii)  the advisory council finds does not use the money as required by Subsection 32B-2-403(2) on the basis of the report filed by the municipality or county under Subsection (1); and

(b)  cancel a suspension under Subsection (2)(a).

(3)  The State Tax Commission shall notify the advisory council of the balance of any undistributed money after the annual distribution under Subsection 32B-2-404(5).

(4) (a)  Subject to the requirements of this Subsection (4), the advisory council shall award the balance of undistributed money under Subsection (3):

(i)  as prioritized by majority vote of the advisory council; and

(ii)  as grants to:

(A)  a county;

(B)  a municipality;

(C)  the department;

(D)  the Department of Human Services;

(E)  the Department of Public Safety; or

(F)  the Utah State Office of Education.

(b)  By not later than May 30 of the fiscal year of the appropriation, the advisory council shall notify the State Tax Commission of grants awarded under this Subsection (4).

(c)  The State Tax Commission shall make payments of a grant:

(i)  upon receiving notice as provided under Subsection (4)(b); and

(ii)  by not later than June 30 of the fiscal year of the appropriation.

(d)  An entity that receives a grant under this Subsection (4) shall use the grant money exclusively for programs or projects described in Subsection 32B-2-403(2).



Enacted by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session, (Coordination Clause)

